Washington statutes.
RCW 39.40.020

Existing election laws to apply.

In all such elections the provisions of existing law with respect to registration, opening and closing of registration books and the duties of officers and the appointment and selection of election officials shall apply.

[ 1925 c 13 s 2; RRS s 5646-2.]

NOTES:

Election laws in general: Title 29A RCW.